Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.20.4781

Center for human rights—Reports.

The University of Washington center for human rights shall report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2010, and biennially thereafter regarding the center's activities. The report shall include, but not be limited to, descriptions of the center's activities and accomplishments especially as they relate to: International human rights issues and community service; documentation of measurable accomplishments in improving outcomes in the issue areas outlined in RCW 28B.20.478; and documentation of engagement with agencies and nongovernmental organizations outside of the University of Washington.

[ 2009 c 465 s 2.]